Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2493XS (2) 91 ll/js S.F. 341 Section 1. Section 331.301, subsection 18, paragraphs b and 1 d, Code 2025, are amended to read as follows: 2 b. A county with a population greater than seventy-five 3 thousand shall not adopt or enforce any regulation, 4 restriction, or other ordinance, including a conditional use 5 permit requirement, relating to short-term rental properties 6 within the county. A short-term rental property shall be 7 classified as a residential land use for zoning purposes. 8 d. A county with a population greater than seventy-five 9 thousand shall not require a license or permit fee for a 10 short-term rental property in the county. 11 Sec. 2. Section 414.1, subsection 1, paragraph e, 12 subparagraphs (2) and (4), Code 2025, are amended to read as 13 follows: 14 (2) A city with a population greater than seventy-five 15 thousand shall not adopt or enforce any regulation, 16 restriction, or other ordinance, including a conditional use 17 permit requirement, relating to short-term rental properties 18 within the city. A short-term rental property shall be 19 classified as a residential land use for zoning purposes. 20 (4) A city with a population greater than seventy-five 21 thousand shall not require a license or permit fee for a 22 short-term rental property in the city. 23